West Virginia, session 2025, SB276.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 8a.  preparation, distribution or exhibition of obscene material to minors. §61-8A-2a. Prohibiting presence of minors at adult-oriented performances; penalties. It is a criminal offense for a person to engage in an adult cabaret performance:On public property; orIn a location where the adult cabaret performance could be viewed by a person who is a minor.Notwithstanding any other provision of West Virginia law, this section expressly preempts an ordinance, regulation, restriction, or license that was lawfully adopted or issued by a political subdivision prior to the effective date of this code section."Adult cabaret performance" means a performance in a location other than an adult cabaret that features topless dancers, go-go dancers, exotic dancers, strippers, male or female impersonators who provide entertainment that appeals to the prurient interest, or similar entertainers, regardless of whether performed for consideration.A first offense for a violation of this section is a misdemeanor, and a second or subsequent such offense is a felony.A person convicted of a felony under this section shall be fined not more than $25,000 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility for not more than five years, or both fined and imprisoned.